Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.130

Elected receiver—Failure to qualify—Court to appoint.

If the person elected receiver fails to qualify as such within the prescribed time, the council shall file in the superior court of the county a petition setting forth the fact of the election, its result and the failure of the person elected receiver to qualify within the prescribed time and praying for the appointment of another person as receiver. Notice of the filing of the petition and of the time fixed for hearing thereon must be served upon the person elected receiver at least three days before the time fixed for the hearing. If he or she cannot be found within the county, no notice need be served, and the court may proceed with full jurisdiction to determine the matter upon the hearing. Unless good cause to the contrary is shown, the court shall appoint some suitable person to act as receiver, who shall qualify as required by RCW 35.07.120 within ten days from the date of his or her appointment.

If the council fails to procure the appointment of a receiver, any person qualified to vote in the city or town may file such a petition and make such application.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2003; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.130. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 8; RRS s 8921.]